Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.060

Delivery to sheriff if to him or her directed.

If the writ be directed to the sheriff, it shall be delivered by the clerk to him or her without delay.

[ 2011 c 336 s 188; Code 1881 s 670; 1877 p 138 s 673; 1869 p 156 s 610; 1854 p 212 s 438; RRS s 1068.]